Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1424
Commission; verification and reporting duties.

The commission shall:

(1) Review and verify all information submitted by public postsecondary systems and institutions as part of the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System and make such corrections in the submitted information as are necessary; and

(2) Prepare and disseminate an annual report of the information submitted by each public postsecondary system and institution and those private postsecondary educational institutions willing to cooperate as part of the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System.

Laws 1978, LB 897, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 290, § 8;

Laws 1988, LB 927, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 109;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 85-974;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 28.